Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.513

Application of chapter to certain postdoctoral and clinical university employees.

In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter applies to postdoctoral and clinical employees as excluded in chapter 41.76 RCW at the University of Washington and at Washington State University.

[ 2012 c 255 s 1.]